Communist/HunDict/1/dic.aff
SET UTF-8
FLAG num

# This Russian dictionary is  packaged to .oxt in 2011,2013, 2014, 2015 and converted
# to Hunspell format by Yakov Reztsov in 2011 from
# http://sourceforge.net/projects/seman/  (http://www.aot.ru) 
# License: LGPL v2.1.
# Verion: 0.4.0

TRY оаеиёнстрлвпуяыюэкмдьзбгшчйжхщцфъ
KEY йцукенгшщзхъфывапролджэячсмитьбю|её
WORDCHARS -.'`

BREAK 0

FORBIDDENWORD  12


NOSPLITSUGS
MAXNGRAMSUGS 2
ONLYMAXDIFF
MAXDIFF 0

ICONV 2
ICONV ' ъ
ICONV ` ъ

MAP 1
MAP её

REP 10
REP е ё
REP ё e
REP тс ц
REP ц тс	
REP н нн
REP нн н
REP л лл	
REP лл л	
REP тся ться
REP ться тся	

PFX 9 Y 49
PFX 9 0 псевдо .
PFX 9 0 ультра .
PFX 9 0 анти .
PFX 9 0 не .
PFX 9 0 без ^[и]
PFX 9 и безы [и]
PFX 9 0 небез ^[и]
PFX 9 и небезы [и]
PFX 9 0 пост .
PFX 9 0 пред .
PFX 9 0 противо .
PFX 9 0 микро .
PFX 9 0 полу .
PFX 9 0 контр .
PFX 9 0 сверх .
PFX 9 0 пере .
PFX 9 0 квази .
PFX 9 0 дез .
PFX 9 0 за .
PFX 9 0 само .
PFX 9 0 внутри .
PFX 9 0 супер .
PFX 9 0 поли .
PFX 9 0 много .
PFX 9 0 одно .
PFX 9 0 до .
PFX 9 0 пан .
PFX 9 0 пра .
PFX 9 0 архи .
PFX 9 0 де .
PFX 9 0 пара .
PFX 9 0 макро .
PFX 9 0 недо .
PFX 9 0 мета .
PFX 9 0 вне .
PFX 9 0 гипер .
PFX 9 0 разно .
PFX 9 0 экстра .
PFX 9 0 около .
PFX 9 0 мало .
PFX 9 0 низко .
PFX 9 0 дис .
PFX 9 0 бес .
PFX 9 0 мини .
PFX 9 0 гипо .
PFX 9 0 двух .
PFX 9 0 интер .
PFX 9 0 дву .
PFX 9 0 мульти .



SFX 8 Y 28
SFX 8 ый ый .
SFX 8 ый ого .
SFX 8 ый ому .
SFX 8 ый ого .
SFX 8 ый ый .
SFX 8 ый ым .
SFX 8 ый ом .
SFX 8 ый ая .
SFX 8 ый ой .
SFX 8 ый ой .
SFX 8 ый ую .
SFX 8 ый ой .
SFX 8 ый ою .
SFX 8 ый ой .
SFX 8 ый ое .
SFX 8 ый ого .
SFX 8 ый ому .
SFX 8 ый ое .
SFX 8 ый ым .
SFX 8 ый ом .
SFX 8 ый ые .
SFX 8 ый ых .
SFX 8 ый ым .
SFX 8 ый ых .
SFX 8 ый ые .
SFX 8 ый ыми .
SFX 8 ый ых .
SFX 8 ый 0 .


SFX 1 Y 32
SFX 1 ный ный .
SFX 1 ный ного .
SFX 1 ный ному .
SFX 1 ный ного .
SFX 1 ный ный .
SFX 1 ный ным .
SFX 1 ный ном .
SFX 1 ный ная .
SFX 1 ный ной .
SFX 1 ный ной .
SFX 1 ный ную .
SFX 1 ный ной .
SFX 1 ный ною .
SFX 1 ный ной .
SFX 1 ный ное .
SFX 1 ный ного .
SFX 1 ный ному .
SFX 1 ный ное .
SFX 1 ный ным .
SFX 1 ный ном .
SFX 1 ный ные .
SFX 1 ный ных .
SFX 1 ный ным .
SFX 1 ный ных .
SFX 1 ный ные .
SFX 1 ный ными .
SFX 1 ный ных .
SFX 1 ный ен .
SFX 1 ный на .
SFX 1 ный но .
SFX 1 ный ны .
SFX 1 ный 0 .

SFX 2 Y 29
SFX 2 ий ий .
SFX 2 ий ого .
SFX 2 ий ому .
SFX 2 ий ого .
SFX 2 ий ий .
SFX 2 ий им .
SFX 2 ий ом .
SFX 2 ий ая .
SFX 2 ий ой .
SFX 2 ий ой .
SFX 2 ий ую .
SFX 2 ий ой .
SFX 2 ий ою .
SFX 2 ий ой .
SFX 2 ий ое .
SFX 2 ий ого .
SFX 2 ий ому .
SFX 2 ий ое .
SFX 2 ий им .
SFX 2 ий ом .
SFX 2 ий ие .
SFX 2 ий их .
SFX 2 ий им .
SFX 2 ий их .
SFX 2 ий ие .
SFX 2 ий ими .
SFX 2 ий их .
SFX 2 ий и .
SFX 2 ий на .

SFX 3 Y 32
SFX 3 ьный ьный .
SFX 3 ьный ьного .
SFX 3 ьный ьному .
SFX 3 ьный ьного .
SFX 3 ьный ьный .
SFX 3 ьный ьным .
SFX 3 ьный ьном .
SFX 3 ьный ьная .
SFX 3 ьный ьной .
SFX 3 ьный ьной .
SFX 3 ьный ьную .
SFX 3 ьный ьной .
SFX 3 ьный ьною .
SFX 3 ьный ьной .
SFX 3 ьный ьное .
SFX 3 ьный ьного .
SFX 3 ьный ьному .
SFX 3 ьный ьное .
SFX 3 ьный ьным .
SFX 3 ьный ьном .
SFX 3 ьный ьные .
SFX 3 ьный ьных .
SFX 3 ьный ьным .
SFX 3 ьный ьных .
SFX 3 ьный ьные .
SFX 3 ьный ьными .
SFX 3 ьный ьных .
SFX 3 ьный ен .
SFX 3 ьный ьна .
SFX 3 ьный ьно .
SFX 3 ьный ьны .
SFX 3 ьный 0 .

SFX 4 Y 29
SFX 4 ий ий .
SFX 4 ий его .
SFX 4 ий ему .
SFX 4 ий его .
SFX 4 ий ий .
SFX 4 ий им .
SFX 4 ий ем .
SFX 4 ий ая .
SFX 4 ий ей .
SFX 4 ий ей .
SFX 4 ий ую .
SFX 4 ий ей .
SFX 4 ий ею .
SFX 4 ий ей .
SFX 4 ий ее .
SFX 4 ий его .
SFX 4 ий ему .
SFX 4 ий ее .
SFX 4 ий им .
SFX 4 ий ем .
SFX 4 ий ие .
SFX 4 ий их .
SFX 4 ий им .
SFX 4 ий их .
SFX 4 ий ие .
SFX 4 ий ими .
SFX 4 ий их .
SFX 4 ий е .
SFX 4 ий ьна .

SFX 5 Y 28
SFX 5 ой ой .
SFX 5 ой ого .
SFX 5 ой ому .
SFX 5 ой ого .
SFX 5 ой ой .
SFX 5 ой ым .
SFX 5 ой ом .
SFX 5 ой ая .
SFX 5 ой ой .
SFX 5 ой ой .
SFX 5 ой ую .
SFX 5 ой ой .
SFX 5 ой ою .
SFX 5 ой ой .
SFX 5 ой ое .
SFX 5 ой ого .
SFX 5 ой ому .
SFX 5 ой ое .
SFX 5 ой ым .
SFX 5 ой ом .
SFX 5 ой ые .
SFX 5 ой ых .
SFX 5 ой ым .
SFX 5 ой ых .
SFX 5 ой ые .
SFX 5 ой ыми .
SFX 5 ой ых .
SFX 5 ой е .

SFX 6 Y 32
SFX 6 ый ый .
SFX 6 ый ого .
SFX 6 ый ому .
SFX 6 ый ого .
SFX 6 ый ый .
SFX 6 ый ым .
SFX 6 ый ом .
SFX 6 ый ая .
SFX 6 ый ой .
SFX 6 ый ой .
SFX 6 ый ую .
SFX 6 ый ой .
SFX 6 ый ою .
SFX 6 ый ой .
SFX 6 ый ое .
SFX 6 ый ого .
SFX 6 ый ому .
SFX 6 ый ое .
SFX 6 ый ым .
SFX 6 ый ом .
SFX 6 ый ые .
SFX 6 ый ых .
SFX 6 ый ым .
SFX 6 ый ых .
SFX 6 ый ые .
SFX 6 ый ыми .
SFX 6 ый ых .
SFX 6 ый 0 .
SFX 6 ый а .
SFX 6 ый о .
SFX 6 ый ы .
SFX 6 ый  .

SFX 7 Y 28
SFX 7 ий ий .
SFX 7 ий ого .
SFX 7 ий ому .
SFX 7 ий ого .
SFX 7 ий ий .
SFX 7 ий им .
SFX 7 ий ом .
SFX 7 ий ая .
SFX 7 ий ой .
SFX 7 ий ой .
SFX 7 ий ую .
SFX 7 ий ой .
SFX 7 ий ою .
SFX 7 ий ой .
SFX 7 ий ое .
SFX 7 ий ого .
SFX 7 ий ому .
SFX 7 ий ое .
SFX 7 ий им .
SFX 7 ий ом .
SFX 7 ий ие .
SFX 7 ий их .
SFX 7 ий им .
SFX 7 ий их .
SFX 7 ий ие .
SFX 7 ий ими .
SFX 7 ий их .
SFX 7 ий 0 .

SFX 10 Y 13
SFX 10 0  .
SFX 10 0 а .
SFX 10 0 у .
SFX 10 0 а .
SFX 10 0 ом .
SFX 10 0 е .
SFX 10 0 и .
SFX 10 0 ов .
SFX 10 0 ам .
SFX 10 0 ов .
SFX 10 0 ами .
SFX 10 0 ах .
SFX 10 0 ою .

SFX 11 Y 2
SFX 11 0  .
SFX 11 0 а .

SFX 13 Y 70
SFX 13 иться иться .
SFX 13 иться усь .
SFX 13 иться имся .
SFX 13 иться ишься .
SFX 13 иться итесь .
SFX 13 иться ится .
SFX 13 иться атся .
SFX 13 иться ился .
SFX 13 иться илась .
SFX 13 иться илось .
SFX 13 иться ились .
SFX 13 иться ась .
SFX 13 иться ившись .
SFX 13 иться ься .
SFX 13 иться ьтесь .
SFX 13 иться ащийся .
SFX 13 иться ащегося .
SFX 13 иться ащемуся .
SFX 13 иться ащегося .
SFX 13 иться ащийся .
SFX 13 иться ащимся .
SFX 13 иться ащемся .
SFX 13 иться ащаяся .
SFX 13 иться ащейся .
SFX 13 иться ащейся .
SFX 13 иться ащуюся .
SFX 13 иться ащейся .
SFX 13 иться ащеюся .
SFX 13 иться ащейся .
SFX 13 иться ащееся .
SFX 13 иться ащегося .
SFX 13 иться ащемуся .
SFX 13 иться ащееся .
SFX 13 иться ащимся .
SFX 13 иться ащемся .
SFX 13 иться ащиеся .
SFX 13 иться ащихся .
SFX 13 иться ащимся .
SFX 13 иться ащихся .
SFX 13 иться ащиеся .
SFX 13 иться ащимися .
SFX 13 иться ащихся .
SFX 13 иться ившийся .
SFX 13 иться ившегося .
SFX 13 иться ившемуся .
SFX 13 иться ившегося .
SFX 13 иться ившийся .
SFX 13 иться ившимся .
SFX 13 иться ившемся .
SFX 13 иться ившаяся .
SFX 13 иться ившейся .
SFX 13 иться ившейся .
SFX 13 иться ившуюся .
SFX 13 иться ившейся .
SFX 13 иться ившеюся .
SFX 13 иться ившейся .
SFX 13 иться ившееся .
SFX 13 иться ившегося .
SFX 13 иться ившемуся .
SFX 13 иться ившееся .
SFX 13 иться ившимся .
SFX 13 иться ившемся .
SFX 13 иться ившиеся .
SFX 13 иться ившихся .
SFX 13 иться ившимся .
SFX 13 иться ившихся .
SFX 13 иться ившиеся .
SFX 13 иться ившимися .
SFX 13 иться ившихся .
SFX 13 иться 0 .

SFX 14 Y 45
SFX 14 уть уть .
SFX 14 уть ул .
SFX 14 уть ула .
SFX 14 уть уло .
SFX 14 уть ули .
SFX 14 уть у .
SFX 14 уть ем .
SFX 14 уть ешь .
SFX 14 уть ете .
SFX 14 уть ет .
SFX 14 уть ут .
SFX 14 уть ув .
SFX 14 уть увши .
SFX 14 уть ем .
SFX 14 уть емте .
SFX 14 уть и .
SFX 14 уть ите .
SFX 14 уть увший .
SFX 14 уть увшего .
SFX 14 уть увшему .
SFX 14 уть увшего .
SFX 14 уть увший .
SFX 14 уть увшим .
SFX 14 уть увшем .
SFX 14 уть увшая .
SFX 14 уть увшей .
SFX 14 уть увшей .
SFX 14 уть увшую .
SFX 14 уть увшей .
SFX 14 уть увшею .
SFX 14 уть увшей .
SFX 14 уть увшее .
SFX 14 уть увшего .
SFX 14 уть увшему .
SFX 14 уть увшее .
SFX 14 уть увшим .
SFX 14 уть увшем .
SFX 14 уть увшие .
SFX 14 уть увших .
SFX 14 уть увшим .
SFX 14 уть увших .
SFX 14 уть увшие .
SFX 14 уть увшими .
SFX 14 уть увших .
SFX 14 уть ившемуся .

SFX 15 Y 14
SFX 15 ка ка .
SFX 15 ка ки .
SFX 15 ка ке .
SFX 15 ка ку .
SFX 15 ка кой .
SFX 15 ка кою .
SFX 15 ка ке .
SFX 15 ка ки .
SFX 15 ка ок .
SFX 15 ка кам .
SFX 15 ка ки .
SFX 15 ка ками .
SFX 15 ка ках .
SFX 15 ка ем .

SFX 16 Y 14
SFX 16 ка ка .
SFX 16 ка ки .
SFX 16 ка ке .
SFX 16 ка ку .
SFX 16 ка кой .
SFX 16 ка кою .
SFX 16 ка ке .
SFX 16 ка ки .
SFX 16 ка ек .
SFX 16 ка кам .
SFX 16 ка ки .
SFX 16 ка ками .
SFX 16 ка ках .
SFX 16 ка ем .

SFX 17 Y 13
SFX 17 ь ь .
SFX 17 ь и .
SFX 17 ь и .
SFX 17 ь ь .
SFX 17 ь ью .
SFX 17 ь и .
SFX 17 ь и .
SFX 17 ь ей .
SFX 17 ь ям .
SFX 17 ь и .
SFX 17 ь ями .
SFX 17 ь ях .
SFX 17 ь ках .

SFX 18 Y 14
SFX 18 а а .
SFX 18 а ы .
SFX 18 а е .
SFX 18 а у .
SFX 18 а ой .
SFX 18 а ою .
SFX 18 а е .
SFX 18 а ы .
SFX 18 а 0 .
SFX 18 а ам .
SFX 18 а  .
SFX 18 а ами .
SFX 18 а ах .
SFX 18 а ем .

SFX 21 Y 13
SFX 21 0  .
SFX 21 0 а .
SFX 21 0 у .
SFX 21 0  .
SFX 21 0 ом .
SFX 21 0 е .
SFX 21 0 и .
SFX 21 0 ов .
SFX 21 0 ам .
SFX 21 0 и .
SFX 21 0 ами .
SFX 21 0 ах .
SFX 21 0 ах .

SFX 22 Y 2
SFX 22 0  .
SFX 22 0 а .

SFX 23 Y 2
SFX 23 0  .
SFX 23 0 а .

SFX 24 Y 2
SFX 24 0  .
SFX 24 0 а .

SFX 25 Y 2
SFX 25 0  .
SFX 25 0 а .

SFX 26 Y 2
SFX 26 0  .
SFX 26 0 а .

SFX 27 Y 2
SFX 27 0  .
SFX 27 0 а .

SFX 28 Y 14
SFX 28 0  .
SFX 28 0 а .
SFX 28 0 у .
SFX 28 0 а .
SFX 28 0 ом .
SFX 28 0 е .
SFX 28 0 ы .
SFX 28 0 ов .
SFX 28 0 ам .
SFX 28 0 ов .
SFX 28 0 ами .
SFX 28 0 ах .
SFX 28 0  .
SFX 28 0 ем .

SFX 29 Y 8
SFX 29 а а .
SFX 29 а ы .
SFX 29 а е .
SFX 29 а у .
SFX 29 а ой .
SFX 29 а ою .
SFX 29 а е .
SFX 29 а ов .

SFX 30 Y 2
SFX 30 0  .
SFX 30 0 ы .

SFX 31 Y 38
SFX 31 а а .
SFX 31 а ы .
SFX 31 а е .
SFX 31 а у .
SFX 31 а ой .
SFX 31 а ою .
SFX 31 а е .
SFX 31 а ы .
SFX 31 а 0 .
SFX 31 а ам .
SFX 31 а  .
SFX 31 а ами .
SFX 31 а ах .
SFX 31 а ович .
SFX 31 а овича .
SFX 31 а овичу .
SFX 31 а овича .
SFX 31 а овичем .
SFX 31 а овиче .
SFX 31 а овичи .
SFX 31 а овичей .
SFX 31 а овичам .
SFX 31 а овичей .
SFX 31 а овичами .
SFX 31 а овичах .
SFX 31 а овна .
SFX 31 а овны .
SFX 31 а овне .
SFX 31 а овну .
SFX 31 а овной .
SFX 31 а овне .
SFX 31 а овны .
SFX 31 а овен .
SFX 31 а овнам .
SFX 31 а овен .
SFX 31 а овнами .
SFX 31 а овнах .
SFX 31 а увшие .

SFX 32 Y 13
SFX 32 0  .
SFX 32 0 а .
SFX 32 0 у .
SFX 32 0  .
SFX 32 0 ом .
SFX 32 0 е .
SFX 32 0 ы .
SFX 32 0 ов .
SFX 32 0 ам .
SFX 32 0 ы .
SFX 32 0 ами .
SFX 32 0 ах .
SFX 32 0 ах .

SFX 33 Y 19
SFX 33 0  .
SFX 33 0 а .
SFX 33 0 у .
SFX 33 0 а .
SFX 33 0 ым .
SFX 33 0 е .
SFX 33 0 ы .
SFX 33 0 ых .
SFX 33 0 ым .
SFX 33 0 ых .
SFX 33 0 ыми .
SFX 33 0 ых .
SFX 33 0 а .
SFX 33 0 ой .
SFX 33 0 ой .
SFX 33 0 у .
SFX 33 0 ой .
SFX 33 0 ой .
SFX 33 0 овиче .

SFX 35 Y 13
SFX 35 ец ец .
SFX 35 ец ца .
SFX 35 ец цу .
SFX 35 ец ца .
SFX 35 ец цем .
SFX 35 ец це .
SFX 35 ец цы .
SFX 35 ец цев .
SFX 35 ец цам .
SFX 35 ец цев .
SFX 35 ец цами .
SFX 35 ец цах .
SFX 35 ец а .

SFX 36 Y 14
SFX 36 ка ка .
SFX 36 ка ки .
SFX 36 ка ке .
SFX 36 ка ку .
SFX 36 ка кой .
SFX 36 ка кою .
SFX 36 ка ке .
SFX 36 ка ки .
SFX 36 ка ок .
SFX 36 ка кам .
SFX 36 ка ок .
SFX 36 ка ками .
SFX 36 ка ках .
SFX 36 ка ой .

SFX 37 Y 14
SFX 37 я я .
SFX 37 я и .
SFX 37 я и .
SFX 37 я ю .
SFX 37 я ей .
SFX 37 я ею .
SFX 37 я и .
SFX 37 я и .
SFX 37 я й .
SFX 37 я ям .
SFX 37 я и .
SFX 37 я ями .
SFX 37 я ях .
SFX 37 я ой .

SFX 38 Y 37
SFX 38 й й .
SFX 38 й я .
SFX 38 й ю .
SFX 38 й я .
SFX 38 й ем .
SFX 38 й е .
SFX 38 й и .
SFX 38 й ев .
SFX 38 й ям .
SFX 38 й ев .
SFX 38 й ями .
SFX 38 й ях .
SFX 38 й евич .
SFX 38 й евича .
SFX 38 й евичу .
SFX 38 й евича .
SFX 38 й евичем .
SFX 38 й евиче .
SFX 38 й евичи .
SFX 38 й евичей .
SFX 38 й евичам .
SFX 38 й евичей .
SFX 38 й евичами .
SFX 38 й евичах .
SFX 38 й евна .
SFX 38 й евны .
SFX 38 й евне .
SFX 38 й евну .
SFX 38 й евной .
SFX 38 й евне .
SFX 38 й евны .
SFX 38 й евен .
SFX 38 й евнам .
SFX 38 й евен .
SFX 38 й евнами .
SFX 38 й евнах .
SFX 38 й овнах .

SFX 40 Y 2
SFX 40 0  .
SFX 40 0 я .

SFX 41 Y 7
SFX 41 0  .
SFX 41 0 а .
SFX 41 0 у .
SFX 41 0  .
SFX 41 0 ем .
SFX 41 0 е .
SFX 41 0 и .

SFX 42 Y 7
SFX 42 й й .
SFX 42 й я .
SFX 42 й ю .
SFX 42 й й .
SFX 42 й ем .
SFX 42 й е .
SFX 42 й и .
